Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 4

Mental Health, Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention and/or Treatment, Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, and Personal Support Services Licensure Law

33-2-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Mental Health, Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention and/or Treatment, Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, and Personal Support Services Licensure Law.”

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-1801, 33-2-501; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 282, § 2; 2012, ch. 1010, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Licensing of alcohol and drug abuse counselors, title 68, ch. 24, part 6.

33-2-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abuse” means the knowing infliction of injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment with resulting physical harm, pain, or mental anguish;

“Alcohol and drug prevention and/or treatment facility” means an institution, treatment resource, group residence (boarding home, sheltered workshop, activity center), rehabilitation center, hospital, community mental health center, nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility, nonresidential substitution-based treatment center for opiate addiction, DUI school, counseling center, clinic, halfway house, or other entity, by these or other names, providing alcohol and drug services; provided, that a DUI school operated by a state institution of higher education shall not be considered an alcohol and drug treatment facility for purposes of this chapter; provided, further, that “alcohol and drug prevention and treatment facility” does not include any facility otherwise licensed by the department or the department of health or approved by the department of education;

“Alcohol and drug services” includes evaluation, treatment, residential personal care, habilitation, rehabilitation, counseling or supervision of persons who abuse or are dependent upon alcohol or drugs, or services to persons designed to prevent alcohol or drug abuse or dependence that either receive funds from the department of health or assess fees for services provided; provided, that a DUI school operated by a state institution of higher education shall not be considered alcohol and drug services for purposes of this part;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, or, when applicable, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, the commissioner's authorized representative, or in the event of the commissioner's absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, or, when applicable, the deputy commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

“Consumer direction” means a model of service delivery for certain medicaid home and community-based services in which the person receiving the services, family member, or other representative employs and supervises the individual who provides the services;

“Department” means the department of mental health and substance abuse services, or, when applicable, the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

“Facility” means a developmental center, treatment resource, group residence, boarding home, sheltered workshop, activity center, rehabilitation center, hospital, community mental health center, counseling center, clinic, group home, halfway house or any other entity that provides a mental health, intellectual or developmental disability service or an alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment facility;

“Licensee” means a proprietorship, a partnership, an association, a governmental agency, or corporation, that operates a facility or a service and has obtained a license under this part;

“Misappropriation of property” means the deliberate misplacement, exploitation, or wrongful, temporary or permanent use of belongings or money without consent;

“Neglect” means failure to provide goods or services necessary to avoid physical harm, mental anguish, or mental illness, which results in injury or probable risk of serious harm;

“Nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility” includes, but is not limited to, stand-alone clinics, treatment resources, individual physical locations occupied as the professional practice of a prescriber or prescribers licensed pursuant to title 63, or other entities prescribing products containing buprenorphine, or products containing any other controlled substance designed to treat opiate addiction by preventing symptoms of withdrawal to twenty-five percent (25%) or more of its patients or to one hundred fifty (150) or more patients;

For the purposes of subdivision (11)(A), “physical location” means real property on which is located a physical structure, whether or not that structure is attached to real property, containing one (1) or more units and includes an individual apartment, office, condominium, cooperative unit, mobile or manufactured home, or trailer, if used as a site for prescribing or dispensing products containing buprenorphine, or products containing any other controlled substance designed to treat opiate addiction by preventing symptoms of withdrawal;

“Nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility” does not include any facility that meets the definition of a nonresidential substitution-based treatment center for opiate addiction;

“Nonresidential substitution-based treatment center for opiate addiction” or “nonresidential opioid treatment program” includes, but is not limited to, stand-alone clinics offering methadone, products containing buprenorphine such as Subutex and Suboxone, or products containing any other formulation designed to treat opiate addiction by preventing symptoms of withdrawal;

“Personal support services” means nursing consultation, education services, and other personal assistance services as defined by rule, which are provided to individuals with substantial limitation in two (2) or more major life activities in either their regular or temporary residences, but does not mean direct nursing services provided in connection with an acute episode of illness or injury;

“Reputable and responsible character” means that the applicant or licensee can be trusted with responsibility for persons who are particularly vulnerable to abuse, neglect, and financial or sexual exploitation; and

“Service” includes any activity to prevent, treat, or ameliorate mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, alcohol and drug use, intellectual or developmental disabilities, which includes diagnosis, evaluation, residential assistance, training, habilitation, rehabilitation, prevention, treatment, counseling, case coordination, or supervision of persons with mental illness, alcohol and drug abuse issues, serious emotional disturbances, and intellectual or developmental disabilities.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 2; 1981, ch. 436, § 1; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25, 26; T.C.A., § 33-1802; Acts 1987, ch. 143, § 1; 1987, ch. 248, § 3; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3, 4; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1993, ch. 234, § 22; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-2-502; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2001, ch. 282, § 1; 2003, ch. 103, § 1; 2003, ch. 242, § 2; 2009, ch. 186, §§ 46, 47; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 24, 34, 35; 2011, ch. 158, § 14; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 1010, § 3; 2016, ch. 912, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 978, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 89, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2016, ch. 912, § 5 provided that the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, upon consultation with the commissioner of health, is authorized to promulgate rules to implement this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Medication assisted treatment guidelines, developed by nationally recognized addiction treatment organizations, such as the United States department of health and human services' substance abuse and mental health services agency, the United States department of health and human services' national institute on drug abuse, and the American Society of Addiction Medicine, shall serve as a guide to the development of the rules.

Acts 2016, ch. 912, § 6 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, inserted “nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility, nonresidential substitution-based treatment center for opiate addiction,” in the definition of “Alcohol and drug prevention and/or treatment facility”; and added the definitions of “nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility" and “ ‘nonresidential substitution-based treatment center for opiate addiction’ or ‘nonresidential opioid treatment program’”.

The 2018 amendment, in the definition of “‘Nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility’”, substituted “twenty-five percent (25%) or more of its patients or to one hundred fifty (150) or more patients” for “to fifty percent (50%) or more of its patients and to one hundred fifty (150) or more patients” at the end of (10)(A) and added (10)(C).

The 2019 amendment added the definition of “consumer direction”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 912, § 7. January 1, 2017; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 89, § 5. April 4, 2019.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

Peer review committees, confidentiality of information, § 63-11-220.

Regulation of health and related facilities, title 68, ch. 11, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Regulation of DUI programs at state universities, OAG 88-08, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (1/11/88).

Private group homes, medication administration by unlicensed staff members, OAG 88-09, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/11/88).

33-2-403. Licensure of mental health, substance abuse, and intellectual and developmental disabilities services and facilities — Exemptions — Rules.

The departments have the authority to license services and facilities operated for the provision of mental health services, alcohol and drug abuse prevention or treatment, for the provision of services for intellectual and developmental disabilities, and for personal support services. The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall license services and facilities operated for persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance or in need of alcohol and drug abuse prevention or treatment services. Subject to subsection (c), the department of mental health and substance abuse services shall also license personal support services for the aged as well as persons with mental illness. Subject to subsection (c), services and facilities operated for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities and personal support services for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities shall be licensed by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities. A personal support services agency licensed by either department may also serve individuals with physical or other disabilities. Notwithstanding any references in this part to the licensing of “facilities” or “services,” only persons, proprietorships, partnerships, associations, governmental agencies, or corporations may be listed on license applications or licenses as the licensed entity.

The following are exempt from licensing under this part:

Private practitioners who are authorized to practice by the boards of healing arts and only in private practice in that capacity. This subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply to a private practitioner, prescriber, or prescribers operating a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility, as defined in § 33-2-402;

A person providing personal care solely to one (1) person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance or developmental disability, or other service recipient receiving personal support services and not in a business arrangement with any other service recipient. This exception shall not apply to an individual who holds out to the public as being in the business of personal support services for compensation;

An individual providing service or support only to members of the person's own family or relatives;

An individual providing service or support that is not subject to licensing under any other title of the code and doing so only on a part-time basis as defined in department rules;

Foster homes that accept placements only from agencies of state government or licensed child-placing agencies;

Services or facilities providing employee assistance programs;

Services or facilities providing only employment placement;

Facilities that are appropriately licensed by the department of health as a:

Hospital whose primary purpose is not the provision of mental health or developmental disabilities services; or

Satellite hospital, as defined by rules of the department of health, whose primary purpose is the provision of mental health or developmental disabilities services, and that the department verifies to the department of health as satisfying standards under this chapter;

Facilities that are operated by state, county, or municipal departments of education, the department of correction, the department of human services, or the department of children's services and that affirmatively state that the primary purpose of the facility is other than the provision of mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment services or intellectual or developmental disabilities services; and

A person providing direct care services to no more than three (3) people receiving services through consumer direction in a medicaid home- and community-based services program. This subdivision (b)(10) does not apply to an individual who holds out to the public as being in the business of providing personal support services for compensation.

A service or facility that can demonstrate compliance with rules and standards by a current personal support services license from another state agency is considered in compliance with rules and standards under this part so that duplicate licensing is not necessary. Personal support services agencies that provide services for the aged or persons with mental illness and persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities shall not be required to obtain a license from both departments. The departments shall work together to ensure that licensure standards for personal support services agencies are appropriate across all of the populations that may be served and are consistently applied.

The licensing entity shall be determined based on the larger population served by the agency as of April 10, 2015, or in the case of new applicants for licensure, the larger population anticipated to be served by the agency at the time of licensure application.

The department shall appoint a review panel to review periodically all exclusions and waivers granted under the licensure law and perform other duties under this part. The department's legal counsel shall advise the panel.

The panel's membership shall be:

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee;

For the mental health panel, a representative of licensed community mental health services and a representative of licensed alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment services;

For the intellectual and developmental disabilities panel, a representative of licensed intellectual disability community services and a representative of licensed developmental disability community services;

For the mental health panel, a representative of a licensed residential facility for persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance and a representative of a licensed residential facility for alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment services;

For the intellectual and developmental disabilities panel, a representative of a licensed residential facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

For the mental health panel, a representative of a licensed residential mental health facility for children and youth;

Five (5) service recipient representatives; and

A representative of a personal support services agency.

The panel shall elect a chair and vice chair and shall report any findings directly to the commissioner.

The vote of a majority binds the panel.

Travel expenses for panel members shall be reimbursed. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in conformity with the comprehensive state travel regulations as promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The license holder of a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility shall ensure that adequate billing records are maintained, in any format, onsite at the nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility and shall ensure that adequate billing records are maintained for all patients and for all patient visits. Billing records shall be maintained for a period of three (3) years from the date of the patient's last treatment at the nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility. Billing records shall be made for all methods of payment. Billing records shall be made available to the department upon request. Billing records shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The amount paid for services;

Method of payment;

Date of the delivery of services;

Date of payment; and

Description of services.

The license holder of a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility shall ensure that records of all bank deposits of cash payments for services provided at the nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility are maintained, in any format, at the nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility for a period of three (3) years.

The license holder of a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility shall ensure that patient medical records are maintained, in any format, for a period of ten (10) years from the date of the patient's last treatment at the facility.

By January 1, 2019, the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall revise rules for nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facilities to be consistent with state and federal law and to establish:

Standards for determining what constitutes a high dose of the opioid employed in treatment at a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility;

Protocols for initiating or switching a patient at a nonresidential office-based treatment facility to a high dose of the opioids employed in treatment; and

Protocols for initiating periodic prescriber-initiated-and-led discussions with patients regarding patient readiness to taper down or taper off the opioids employed in treatment.

The commissioner is authorized to use emergency rulemaking under § 4-5-208 to promulgate the rules pursuant to subsection (h). The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Beginning in 2020, the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall review the rules for nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facilities by September 30 of each even-numbered year.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall submit the rules for nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facilities to each health-related board that licenses any practitioner authorized by the state to prescribe the products for the treatment of an opioid use disorder as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and to the board of pharmacy.

Each board shall review the rules and enforce the rules with respect to that board's licensees.

When a board's licensees are subject to the rules for nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facilities, the definition of “enforce” for purposes of this subdivision (j)(3) means referring any complaints or information regarding those licensees to the department.

Each board shall post the rules on the licensing board's website.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall provide a copy of any emergency rule developed pursuant to subsection (h) or (i) and any revision to a rule developed pursuant to subsection (j) to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate at the same time the rules are submitted to the licensing boards pursuant to subdivision (j)(2).

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall provide a copy of any rule developed pursuant to subsection (h) or (j) and any revision to a rule developed pursuant to subsection (j) to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

A violation of a rule described in subsections (h) and (j) is grounds for disciplinary action against a practitioner licensed under title 63 by the board that licensed that practitioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, §§ 2, 3, 13; 1981, ch. 436, § 1; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25, 26, 31; T.C.A., § 33-1802; Acts 1987, ch. 143, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-1812; Acts 1987, ch. 248, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 33-1803; Acts 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-5; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22, 23; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-2-502, 33-2-503, 33-2-512; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2001, ch. 282, § 3; 2002, ch. 730, § 2; 2007, ch. 304, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 24; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 1010, §§ 4-6; 2015, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 912, §§ 3, 4; 2018, ch. 978, § 3; 2019, ch. 89, §§ 2-4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2016, ch. 912, § 5 provided that the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, upon consultation with the commissioner of health, is authorized to promulgate rules to implement the act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Medication assisted treatment guidelines, developed by nationally recognized addiction treatment organizations, such as the United States department of health and human services' substance abuse and mental health services agency, the United States department of health and human services' national institute on drug abuse, and the American Society of Addiction Medicine, shall serve as a guide to the development of the rules.

Acts 2016, ch. 912, § 6 provided that notwithstanding the act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), deleted “and/” preceding “or” preceding “treatment” twice and “serious emotional disturbance” in the first sentence, added “Subject to subsection (c),” in the third sentence, and added the fourth sentence; and rewrote (c), which read: “A service or facility that can demonstrate compliance with rules and standards by a previously acquired license from another state agency is considered in compliance with rules and standards under this part to the extent that duplicate inspection and enforcement are necessary.”

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, rewrote (b)(1) which read: “(1) Private practitioners who are both:“(A) Authorized to practice by the boards of healing arts; and“(B) Only in private practice in that capacity;”; and added (e)-(g).

The 2018 amendment added (h) through (l ).

The 2019 amendment added (b)(10).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 110, § 3. April 10, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 912, § 7. January 1, 2017; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 89, § 5. April 4, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Private group homes, medication administration by unlicensed staff members, OAG 88-09, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/11/88).

Licensure of providers of mental health or mental retardation services, OAG 95-109, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 124 (10/19/95).

33-2-404. Rules for licensure — Amendment of rules.

Each department shall adopt rules for licensure of services and facilities regarding adequacy of services, qualification of professional staff, and facility conditions. A department shall require for licensure satisfaction of basic quality standards set under part 3 of this chapter, as applicable, and may require higher standards. The rules shall include consideration of the adequacy of environment, life safety, treatment or habilitation services, education and training requirements of the staff, and other considerations that a department deems necessary to determine the adequacy of the provision of mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, and intellectual and developmental disabilities services. Each department may adopt rules for the administration of the licensure program.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each department shall have the authority to amend its rules for licensure as needed to be consistent with the federal home-based and community-based settings final rule, published in the Federal Register at 79 FR 2947 (January 16, 2014), including the authority to differentiate licensure requirements for any entity contracted to provide medicaid-reimbursed home- and community-based services in order to allow the facility or entity to comply with the federal rule and continue to receive medicaid reimbursement for home- and community-based services. Rules adopted by the department under this subsection (b) shall be developed with input from stakeholders and promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; provided, however, that the department shall not promulgate emergency rules under this subsection (b) as defined in § 4-5-208. Licensure survey and enforcement shall be conducted in a manner consistent with any rule issued under this subsection (b).

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 4; T.C.A., § 33-1804; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 5; 1993, ch. 234, § 24; T.C.A., § 33-2-504; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2012, ch. 1010, § 7; 2015, ch. 153, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 153, § 4. April 16, 2015.

33-2-405. Operation of unlicensed facility unlawful — Penalty.

It is unlawful for a person, partnership, association or corporation to own or operate a service or facility that provides mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment or intellectual or developmental disability services, or personal support services within the meaning of this title without having obtained a license as required by this part.

A violation of this requirement is a Class B misdemeanor.

Each day of operation without a license constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-1805; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112; T.C.A., § 33-2-505; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 282, § 4; 2012, ch. 1010, § 8.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

33-2-406. Application for licensure.

A person, proprietorship, partnership, association, corporation, or any state, county or local governmental unit or any division, department, board or agency of government shall obtain a license from a department in order to lawfully establish, conduct, operate, or maintain a service or facility that provides mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, intellectual or developmental disability, or personal support services.

The applicant shall submit an application on a department’s form showing that the applicant is of reputable and responsible character and able to comply with the minimum standards for a service or facility providing mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, intellectual or developmental disability services, or personal support services. The application will also show the applicant is able to comply with the department’s rules adopted under this part. The application shall contain the following additional information:

The name of the applicant;

The type of facility or service;

The location;

The name of the person or persons to be in charge; and

Any other information as a department may require.

The department may approve the issuance of a license upon the application without further evidence, or, in its discretion, it may conduct its own investigation.

Proof that a person or business has a personal or business history in any jurisdiction of:

Operation of substandard services or facilities; or

A felony conviction

creates a presumption that the applicant or licensee does not have reputable and responsible character.

An applicant denied a license on the basis of the presumption may request a hearing for the purpose of rebutting the presumption created by this subsection (d).

A license shall not be issued or renewed if the applicant, or any chief executive officer or director of the applicant, does not have reputable and responsible character.

If the department determines that a license should not be granted, it shall notify the applicant. Within fifteen (15) days of notification of denial, the applicant may file a written request for review by the panel appointed under § 33-2-403(d). The review shall be at the earliest possible date, and recommendations shall be reported to the commissioner. The commissioner shall determine whether the original license denial shall remain effective and shall notify the applicant. Within fifteen (15) days of notification, the applicant may file a written request for a hearing before the department. The hearing shall be conducted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

If the department determines that the applicant complies with and will in the future comply with this part and rules adopted under this title and has a reputable and responsible character, the department shall issue a license.

A license is valid for up to one (1) year from the date of issuance. A license may be issued only for the premises or services named in the application, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the service or facility, and may be renewed from year to year. A license is not assignable or transferable except as permitted by § 33-2-418(b)(3). The department may charge a reasonable fee for processing the application and issuance of licenses.

Notwithstanding this part, beginning July 1, 2018, the licensing fee for a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility is one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year. On or after July 1, 2019, the department may revise the fee by rule as otherwise permitted by law.

Notwithstanding this part, beginning July 1, 2018, the department shall apply a reinspection fee of five hundred dollars ($500) to a nonresidential office-based opiate treatment facility. On or after July 1, 2019, the department may revise the fee by rules as otherwise permitted by law.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, §§ 2, 6; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 3; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-27; T.C.A., § 33-1802; Acts 1987, ch. 143, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-1806; Acts 1987, ch. 248, §§ 2, 3; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3, 4, 6, 7; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, § 2; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22, 25; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-2-502, 33-2-506; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2001, ch. 282, § 5; 2002, ch. 730, § 3; 2012, ch. 1010, § 9; 2018, ch. 978, § 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (h)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.